District of Columbia statutes.
9-203.01

Scope of Mayor’s authority.

The Mayor may open, extend, widen, or straighten:

(1)

Any street to conform with the highway plan; or

(2)

Any minor street or alley, upon the petition of the owners of more than 1/2 of the property fronting on the proposed street or alley, or when the Mayor finds that the public interest would be served best by the action.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 301, 30 DCR 148
Public ways, streets and alleys on recorded plats, see § 1-1314.
This section is referenced in § 6-403 and § 9-203.02.
1981 Ed., § 7-441.
Delegation of authority under Law 4-201, see Mayor’s Order 83-139, May 26, 1983.